Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.49.130

Severability—1955 c 33.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the chapter are declared to be severable. The invalidity of any provision as to a national bank or as to the stockholders of a national bank shall not affect its validity as to a state bank or as to the stockholders of a state bank.

[ 1955 c 33 s 30.49.130. Prior: 1953 c 234 s 13. Formerly RCW 30.49.130.]